Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-735
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 37-729 to 37-736 creates a duty of care or ground of liability for injury to person or property.

Laws 1965, c. 193, § 6, p. 590;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1006;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 349.

Because the Recreation Liability Act is in derogation of common law, the act is to be strictly construed. Dykes v. Scotts Bluff Cty. Ag. Socy., Inc., 260 Neb. 375, 617 N.W.2d 817 (2000).